hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/ptex/hyph-rm.ec.tex
% pTeX-friendly hyphenation patterns
%
% language: romansh (rm)
% encoding: ec
%
% This file has been auto-generated from hyph-rm.tex
% with a script [texmf]/scripts/generic/hyph-utf8/generate-ptex-patterns.rb
% See the original file for details about author, licence etc.
%
\bgroup
\lccode"F9="F9
\patterns{
.a3p2n
.anti1
.anti3m2n
an3ti4er
an3ti4era
.bio1
.ca4p3s
.circu2m1
.co2n3j
.contro1
.co1o2p
.di2s3
.di2s4ch3oc
di3s4e3gnar
.e2x1e
.ex2tra3
ex4em3pel
ex4aim3pel
.fran2k3
.free3
.li3p2sa
.narco1
.opto1
.orto3p2
.para1
.plu2s3q
.poli3p2
.pre1
.p2s
.re1ac
.re1i2scr
.sha2re3
.tran2s3ac
.tran2s3c
.tran2s3d
.tran2s3l
.tran2s3n
.tran2s3p
.tran2s3r
.tran2s3t
.su2b3j
.su2b3lu
.su2b3r
.wa2g3n
.wel2t1
a1ie
a1iu
ame2gl1
atg3na
a1uo
a1ya
2at.
e1iu
e2w
o1ia
o1ie
o1io
o1iu
1b
2bb
2bc
2bd
2bf
2bm
2bn
2bp
2bs
2bt
bu3n4ga
2bv
2b.
1c
2cb
2c3c
2cd
2cf
2ck
2cm
2cn
2cq
2cs
2ct
2cz
2chh
2chb
ch2r
2chn
2c.
.c2
1d
2db
2dd
2dg
2dl
2dm
2dn
2dp
4ds.
d2sch
4dsch.
2dt
2dv
2dw
2d.
.d2
.esch3an.
1f
2fb
2fg
2fn
2fs
2ft
2f.
1g
2gb
2gd
2gf
2gg
giu2v1na
4gls.
2gm
4gns.
2gp
2gs
2gt
2gv
2gw
2gz
2gh2t
2g.
1h
2hb
2hd
2hh
hi3p2n
h2l
2hm
2hn
2hr
2hv
2h.
1j
2j.
4js.
1k
2kg
2kf
k2h
2kk
k2l
2km
k2r
2ks
2kt
2k.
1l
2lb
2lc
2ld
2l3f2
2lg
l2h
l2j
2lk
2lm
2ln
2lp
2lq
2lr
2ls
2lt
2lv
2lw
2lz
2l.
1m
2mb
2mc
2mf
2ml
2mn
2mp
2mq
2mr
2ms
2mt
2mv
2mw
2m.
1n
2nb
2nc
2nd
2nf
2ng
2nk
2nl
2nm
2np
2nq
2nr
2ns
4ns.
2n3sch
4ch.
4gl.
4gn.
4tg.
4sch.
4tsch.
n2s3fer
2nt
2nv
2nz
n2g3n
2nheit
2n.
on3li4ne
.oz3an3de
.oz1i2
1p
2pd
per3su3n4ga
l^^f9n4ga
p2h
4ph.
2pn
3p2ne
2ps
3p2sic
2pt
2pz
2p.
1q
2qq
2q.
1r
2rb
2rc
2rd
2rf
r2h
2rg
2rk
2rl
2rm
2rn
2rp
2rq
2rs
2rt
r2t2s3
2rv
2rx
2rw
2rz
2r.
1s2
2schs.
2shm
2sh.
2s3l
2s3s
s4s3m
2s3p2n
2st.
2stb
2stc
2std
2stf
4stg.
2stm
2stn
2stp
2sts
2stt
2stv
2sz
4s.
1t
2tb
2tc
2td
2tf
4tgs.
t2h
t2l
2tm
2tn
2tp
t2s
4tschs.
4ts.
t2t3s
2tv
2tw
t2z
2tzk
tz2s
2t.
1v
2vc
2vs.
2vv
2v.
1w
w2h
wa2r
2w1y
2w.
1x
2xb
2xc
2xf
2xh
2xm
2xp
4xs.
2xt
2xw
2x.
y1ou
y1i
1z
2zb
2zd
2zl
2zn
2zp
2zt
2zs
2zv
2z.
.z2
2f3f
2l3l
2m3m
2n3n
2p3p
2r3r
2t3t
2z3z
s2c2h2
3t4s4c4h2
t2g
g2n
g2l
c2h
g2h
b2l
c2l
f2l
p2l
b2r
c2r
d2r
f2r
g2r
p2r
t2r
z2r
s2c
s2d
s2p
s2t
s2t2g
v2l
v2r
4sps.
.pe4r3en3cun3ter.
pro4s3ma
.tran2s3f
omi4s3du
.giu3v4en3t4e4tg3na
.cre4s3mar.
4z3cha
.vi4sch3na
.mu4sch3na.
.ou4vra.
.pi4tsch3na
.hi4gh5light.
.po4d5cast.
.we4l4l5ness.
.ti4c4k4et.
}
\egroup
